Hawaii statutes.
[§37C-13] Debt affordability study;
purpose, information. (a) The purpose of the debt affordability study
shall be to provide the legislature with information on the affordability of
the future debt planned for the State.

(b) The debt affordability study shall include
the following information:

(1) The projected annual appropriation, by source of
funding, necessary to pay the annual debt service for the ensuing twenty-five
fiscal year period on the following bonds, under the assumption that all are issued:

(A) All authorized, but unissued bonds that
have not lapsed as of the September 30 immediately preceding submittal of the
study; and

(B) All bonds necessary to fund the capital
improvement projects proposed in the fiscal years covered by the applicable
multi-year program and financial plan;

(2) A debt service payment schedule showing the
annual appropriation, by source of funding, necessary to pay, during the
ensuing twenty-five fiscal year period, the annual debt service on:

(A) All bonds identified under paragraph (1);
and

(B) All bonds previously issued, but
remaining outstanding;

(3) The projected ratio of the following for each
source of funding pledged to pay debt service on bonds during each fiscal year
of the ensuing twenty-five fiscal year period:

(A) Annual debt service payments to annual
revenues; and

(B) Annual debt service payments to annual
appropriations;

(4) An examination of whether projected annual
revenues from the source of funding are adequate to pay for the annual debt
service on the bonds;

(5) An examination of whether any increase in annual
debt service payments on the bonds will cause a commensurate decrease of funds
available for operating programs with the same source of funding as the debt
service payments;

(6) An assessment of whether the annual debt service
obligations of the State for the fiscal years covered by the applicable
multi-year program and financial plan are affordable to the State; and

(7) An identification of, and discussion on, any
noncompliance or possible noncompliance of the State's actual or planned debt
issuance with the state debt management policy.

The director of finance may include any other
information in the study deemed appropriate or necessary by the director. [L
2015, c 149, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next